Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 18 Pedestrians

31-18-1.
Applicability of regulations to pedestrians.

Pedestrians shall be subject to traffic control signals at intersections as provided in §§

31-13-6

and

31-13-7

, unless required by local ordinance to comply strictly with the signals, but at all other places pedestrians shall be accorded the privileges and shall be subject to the restrictions stated in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 29, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-18-1

.

31-18-2.
Local ordinances.

Local authorities are empowered by ordinance to require that pedestrians shall strictly comply with the directions of any official traffic control signal and may by ordinance prohibit pedestrians from crossing any roadway in a business district or any designated highways except in a crosswalk.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 29, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-18-2

.

31-18-3.
Right-of-way in crosswalk.

When traffic control signals are not in place or not in operation, the driver of a vehicle shall yield the right of way, slowing down or stopping if need be to so yield, to a pedestrian crossing the roadway within a crosswalk when the pedestrian is upon the half of the roadway upon which the vehicle is traveling, or when the pedestrian is approaching so closely from the opposite half of the roadway as to be in danger, but no pedestrian shall suddenly leave a curb or other place of safety and walk or run into the path of a vehicle which is so close that it is impossible for the driver to yield. This provision shall not apply under the conditions stated in §

31-18-6

.

Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

and in addition to any other penalty provided by law, a judge or magistrate shall impose a mandatory fine of one hundred dollars ($100) for a second or any subsequent violation of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 29, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-18-3

; P.L. 1999, ch. 218, art. 5, § 15; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 113.

31-18-4.
Overtaking of vehicle stopped for pedestrian.

Whenever any vehicle is stopped at a marked crosswalk or at any unmarked crosswalk at an intersection to permit a pedestrian to cross the roadway, the driver of any other vehicle approaching from the rear shall not overtake and pass the stopped vehicle.

Whenever there are no markings to the contrary, there shall be a presumption that there is an unmarked crosswalk at any intersection.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 29, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-18-4

; P.L. 1999, ch. 383, § 5.

31-18-5.
Crossing other than at crosswalks.

Every pedestrian crossing a roadway at any point other than within a marked crosswalk or within an unmarked crosswalk at an intersection shall yield the right-of-way to all vehicles upon the roadway. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 29, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

31-18-5

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 113.

31-18-6.
Crossing where tunnel or overhead is provided.

Any pedestrian crossing a roadway at a point where a pedestrian tunnel or overhead pedestrian crossing has been provided shall yield the right-of-way to all vehicles upon the roadway.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 29, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

31-18-6

.

31-18-7.
Crossing between intersections.

Between adjacent intersections at which traffic control signals are in operation, pedestrians shall not cross at any place except in a marked crosswalk.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 29, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

31-18-7

.

31-18-8.
Due care by drivers.

Notwithstanding other provisions of this chapter or the provisions of any local ordinance, every driver of a vehicle shall exercise due care to avoid colliding with any pedestrian or any person propelling a human-powered vehicle upon any roadway, shall give an audible signal when necessary, and shall exercise proper precaution upon observing any child or any obviously confused, intoxicated, or incapacitated person. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 29, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

31-18-8

; P.L. 1976, ch. 58, § 5; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 113.

31-18-9.
Right half of crosswalks.

Pedestrians shall move, whenever practicable, upon the right half of crosswalks.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 29, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

31-18-9

.

31-18-10.
Walking in street prohibited.

Where sidewalks are provided it shall be unlawful for any pedestrian to walk along and upon an adjacent roadway. Where sidewalks are provided it shall be lawful for a person to run or jog along and upon an adjacent roadway, and if the person shall begin to walk he or she shall walk upon an available sidewalk.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 29, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

31-18-10

; P.L. 1984, ch. 298, § 1.

31-18-11.
Walking, jogging, or running on left.

Where sidewalks are not provided any person walking, jogging, or running along and upon a highway shall, when practicable, walk, jog or run only on the left side of the roadway or its shoulder facing traffic which may approach from the opposite direction. Under no circumstances shall anyone walk, run, or jog on any interstate highway within this state.

Any person jogging or running during the time from one-half hour after sunset to one-half hour before sunrise, shall, in addition, wear reflective material which is visible by low beam headlamps from a distance of at least five hundred feet (500´). In no event, shall the failure to wear reflective clothing be considered as contributing negligence, nor shall the failure to wear reflective clothing be admissible as evidence in the trial of any civil action.

Any person who violates the provisions of this section shall, upon conviction, be fined fifteen dollars ($15.00). If the person has been charged with failure to wear reflective material they shall be issued a citation. If any person issued a citation presents proof of purchase of reflectorized clothing or the minimum amount of reflectorized material to the issuing police department within ten (10) days, the department shall void the violation. Should an individual issued a citation fail to present the proof of purchase within the prescribed time, he or she shall be fined fifteen dollars ($15.00). The fine shall be paid by mail and paid to the traffic tribunal and shall not be recorded on the driving record of the violator.

Any person found to have violated the provisions of this section more than once shall, upon conviction, be fined twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for each subsequent conviction.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 29, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

31-18-11

; P.L. 1984, ch. 298, § 1.

31-18-11.1.
Severability.

If any portion or provision of §§

31-18-10

and

31-18-11

is found by a court of competent jurisdiction to be invalid, the remaining parts or provisions shall remain in full force and effect.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 298, § 2.

31-18-12.
Hitchhiking in road.

No person shall stand in a roadway for the purpose of soliciting a ride from the driver of any vehicle. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 29, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

31-18-12

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 113.

31-18-13.
Use of white cane restricted to blind persons.

It is unlawful for any person, unless totally or partially blind, while on any public street or highway, to carry in a raised or extended position a cane or walking stick which is white in color or white tipped with red.

History of Section.

P.L. 1949, ch. 2255, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-18-13

.

31-18-14.
Full stop for pedestrian with guide dog or white cane.

Whenever a pedestrian is crossing or attempting to cross a public street or highway guided by a seeing-eye guide dog or a hearing-ear signal dog clearly identified as such by a yellow harness, which has been trained and educated to guide and assist the pedestrian in traveling upon the public streets; or carrying in a raised or extended position a cane or walking stick which is white in color or white tipped with red, the driver of every vehicle approaching the intersection, or place where the pedestrian is attempting to cross, shall bring his or her vehicle to a full stop before arriving at the intersection or place of crossing, and before proceeding shall take any precautions that may be necessary to avoid injuring the pedestrian.

History of Section.

P.L. 1949, ch. 2255, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-18-14

; P.L. 1979, ch. 159, § 1.

31-18-15.
Pedestrians who are blind or deaf not guided by dog or carrying white cane.

Nothing contained in §§

31-18-13

—

31-18-16

shall be construed to deprive any person who is blind, visually impaired, or deaf, but not carrying a cane or walking stick, or not being guided by a dog, of the rights and privileges conferred by law upon pedestrians crossing streets or highways. In no case shall the failure of the person who is blind, visually impaired or deaf to carry a cane or walking stick, or to be guided by a guide or signal dog upon the streets, highways, or sidewalks of this state, be held to constitute nor be evidence of contributory negligence.

History of Section.

P.L. 1949, ch. 2255, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

31-18-15

; P.L. 1979, ch. 159, § 2; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 70; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 70.

31-18-16.
Penalty for violations as to people who are blind.

Any person who violates any provision of §§

31-18-13

—

31-18-15

, upon conviction, shall be sentenced to pay a fine not more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

History of Section.

P.L. 1949, ch. 2255, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

31-18-16

; P.L. 1981, ch. 62, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 284, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 383, § 5.

31-18-16.1.
Failure to stop on red signal for blind person at intersection.

Any person who shall violate the provisions of §

31-13-6(3)(i)

at an intersection where a pedestrian is crossing or attempting to cross a public street or highway guided by a seeing-eye dog or a hearing-ear signal dog, clearly identified by a yellow harness, which has been trained and educated to guide and assist the pedestrian in traveling upon the public streets, or carrying in a raised or extended position a cane or walking stick which is white in color or white tipped with red, shall be fined not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 78, § 1.

31-18-17.
Pedestrians on freeways.

Any pedestrian who shall cross any freeway as defined by §

24-10-1

, except in an emergency or to render assistance in case of an accident or unforeseen cause, shall be deemed to be guilty of a civil violation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 19, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 218, art. 6, § 8.

31-18-18.
Right-of-way on sidewalks.

The driver of a vehicle crossing a sidewalk shall yield the right-of-way to all traffic proceeding along and upon the sidewalk. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 58, § 6; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 113.

31-18-19.
Negligence of children.

A violation of any provision of this chapter by a child under the age of fourteen (14) shall not constitute negligence per se although a violation may be considered as evidence of negligence.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 58, § 6.

31-18-20.
Wheelchairs — Rights and duties.

Every person operating a wheelchair upon a sidewalk or roadway shall be granted all the rights and shall be subject to all the duties applicable to a pedestrian.

Every person riding a motorized wheelchair on a bicycle lane, trail or path shall be granted all the rights and shall be subject to all the duties applicable to the driver of a bicycle operating on a bicycle lane trail or path except: (1) when those rights or duties, by their very nature, can have no application; or (2) as otherwise specifically provided under chapters 1 — 27 of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 116, § 2; P.L. 1996, ch. 337, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 64, § 4; P.L. 2005, ch. 67, § 4.

31-18-20.1.
Operation of wheelchairs — Lamps and other equipment required.

Any wheelchair, motorized or manual, operating upon roadways, when in use at nighttime, shall be equipped with: a lamp on the front which shall emit a white light visible from a distance of at least five hundred (500´) feet to the front.

Every wheelchair shall be equipped with a red reflector of a type approved by the division of motor vehicles which shall be visible from six hundred (600´) feet to the rear when directly in front of lawful lower beams of head lamps on a motor vehicle.

Side Reflectors. Every wheelchair operating upon roadways, when in use at nighttime, shall be equipped with a minimum of twenty (20) square inches on each side of the wheelchair of white reflective material on the wheels or tires to indicate as nearly as possible the continuous circular shape and size of the wheels or tires of each wheelchair. All reflective material shall be visible during the hours of darkness from five hundred (500´) feet when viewed under lawful low beam headlights under normal atmospheric conditions on straight, level, unlighted roadway, and shall meet the requirements as prescribed by the division of motor vehicles.

No person shall sell a wheelchair, new or used, that is not equipped with side reflectors, rear reflectors and front white light as required by this section. Wheelchairs sold to institutions for the exclusive use inside facilities shall be exempt from this section, provided that no exempt wheelchair shall be used upon roadways.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 337, § 1.

31-18-20.2.
Wheelchair use in roadway prohibited.

Where sidewalks with curb-cuts and at least thirty-two (32) inches of unobstructed clear width are provided it shall be unlawful for any user of a manual or motorized wheelchair to wheel along and upon an adjacent roadway.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 337, § 1.

31-18-21.
Pedestrians and bike facilities.

Except in the cases of limited access roads, and/or roads of less than twenty-three feet (23´) in width, the director of the department of transportation is authorized and directed to provide for the accommodation of bicycle and pedestrian traffic in the planning, design, construction and reconstruction, and to consider this in the resurfacing and striping of any project undertaken by the department, unless the director, after appropriate review by the director or his or her designees, determines that the inclusion of bike facilities and pedestrian access would be contrary to acceptable standards of public safety, degrade environmental or scenic quality, or conflict with existing right-of-way. In his or her deliberations, the director shall take into consideration the cost of the facilities in relationship to available funding. Bike facilities may include bicycle lanes, routes, paths or trails; permeable paved shoulders; and/or signage.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 102, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 109, § 65; P.L. 2005, ch. 64, § 4; P.L. 2005, ch. 67, § 4.

31-18-22.
Public information and education on the rights of pedestrians.

A program of public information and education designed to educate the motoring public to the rights of pedestrians shall be developed by the department of transportation’s office on highway safety. The department of transportation’s office on highway safety, in cooperation with the department of health, shall study the effectiveness of the implementation of this section and shall submit to the general assembly a report containing its findings by July 1, 2000.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 383, § 6.